Illinois, session 104th, SB424.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Educational Credit for Military Experience 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 32/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Educational Credit for Military Experience Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-195, eff. 1-1-18.)